Utah statutes.
10-1-115.   Legislation enacted by Legislature.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to repeal any section of the various
laws of which this act is comprised when the section is the subject of an
amendment or new legislation enacted by this 42nd session of the Utah
legislature and which becomes law. Furthermore, it is the intent of the
legislature that the corresponding sections of this act shall be construed
with such amended sections so as to give effect to the amendment as if it were
made a part of this act.
